Vermont statutes. Title 11A Vermont Business Corporations
Subchapter 2. Filing Documents

§ 1.20.
Filing requirements.

A document must satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section that adds to or varies these requirements, to be entitled to filing by the Secretary of State.

This title must require or permit filing the document in the Office of the Secretary of State.

The document must contain the information required by this title. It may contain other information as well.

The document must be typewritten or printed or, if electronically transmitted, it must be in a format that can be retrieved or reproduced in typewritten or printed form or in an electronic format prescribed by the Secretary of State.

The document must be in the English language. A corporate name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals, and the certificate of existence required of foreign corporations need not be in English if accompanied by a reasonably authenticated English translation.

The document must be executed:

by the chair of the board of directors of a domestic or foreign corporation, or by any officer of the corporation;

if directors have not been selected or the corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

if the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

The person executing the document shall sign it and state beneath or opposite his or her signature his or her name and the capacity in which he or she signs. The document may but need not contain:

the corporate seal;

an attestation by the secretary or an assistant secretary;

an acknowledgement, verification, or proof.

If the Secretary of State has prescribed a mandatory form or electronic format for the document under section 1.21 of this title, the document must be in or on the prescribed form.

The document must be delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing and must be accompanied by one exact or conformed copy, the correct filing fee, and any penalty required by this title.

Any of the terms of a plan or filed documents may be made dependent on facts ascertainable outside the plan or filed documents as follows:
(j) (1) Any of the terms of a plan or filed documents may be made dependent on facts ascertainable outside the plan or filed documents as follows:

The manner in which the facts operate on the terms of the plan or filed document must be clearly and expressly set forth in the plan or filed document.

The facts may include without limitation actions or events within the control of, or determinations made by, a part to the plan or filing the filed document or a representative of a party to the plan or filing the filed document.

As used in this section:

“Filed document” means a document filed with the secretary of state under any provision of this title, except chapter 15 or section 16.22 of this title.

“Plan” means a plan of merger or share exchange.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 77, eff. June 6, 2008.

§ 1.21.
Forms.

The Secretary of State may prescribe the form or electronic format of and furnish on request forms or specifications for formats for:

Articles of incorporation. Such form shall note the information required under subsection 2.02(a) of this title, together with a summary of such information or provisions as are permitted by this title.

An application for a certificate of good standing.

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this State.

A foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of withdrawal.

The annual report.

If the Secretary of State so requires, compliance with these forms is mandatory.

The Secretary of State may prescribe the form of and furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by this title but their use is not mandatory.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 78, eff. June 6, 2008.

§ 1.22.
Filing; service and copying fees.

The Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this section are delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing:

Articles of incorporation $ 125.00 (2) Application for reserved name $ 20.00 (3) Notice of transfer of reserved name No fee (4) Application for registered name of a foreign corpo- ration $ 25.00 (5) Application for renewal of registered name of a foreign corporation $ 25.00 (6) Statement of change of registered agents or registered office, or both $ 25.00 and not to exceed $1,000.00 per filer per calen- dar year. (7) Agent’s statement of resignation No fee (8) Amendment of articles of incorporation $ 25.00 (9) Restatement of articles of incorporation $ 25.00 (10) Articles of merger or share exchange $ 50.00 (11) Articles of dissolution $ 20.00 (12) Articles of revocation of dissolution $ 20.00 (13) Application for certificate of authority $ 125.00 (14) Application for amended certificate of authority $ 25.00 (15) Application for certificate of withdrawal $ 20.00 (16) Annual report of a foreign corporation $ 200.00 (17) Annual report of a domestic corporation $ 45.00 (18) Application for certificate of good standing $ 25.00 (19) Any other document required or permitted to be filed by this title $ 20.00

Click to view

The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of $25.00 each time process is served on him or her under this title. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if he or she prevails in the proceeding.

The Secretary of State shall collect a fee of $25.00 for copying and certifying the copy of any filed document relating to a domestic or foreign corporation.

When a corporation has been involuntarily terminated for failure to file its annual report, the Secretary of State shall collect, for each year the corporation failed to file its annual report, the annual report filing fee and a reinstatement fee of $25.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2; amended

1993, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 14, 1994;

1997, No. 64

, § 17, eff. Jan. 1, 1998;

2003, No. 70

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. March 1, 2004;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 35;

2013, No. 72

, § 9.

§ 1.23.
Effective time and date of document.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, subsection 1.24(c) of this title, and section 2.03 of this title, a document accepted for filing is effective:

at the date and time of filing, as evidenced by such means as the Secretary of State may use for the purpose of recording the date and time of filing; or

at the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

A document may specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the 90th day after the date it is filed.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 79, eff. June 6, 2008.

§ 1.24.
Correcting filed document.

A domestic or foreign corporation may correct a document filed by the Secretary of State if the document:

is incomplete;

contains an incorrect statement;

was defectively executed, attested, sealed, verified, or acknowledged; or

the electronic transmission of which was defective.

A document is corrected:

by preparing articles of correction that:

describe the document (including its filing date) or attach a copy of it to the articles;

specify the incorrect statement and the reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the execution was defective;

correct the incorrect statement or defective execution; and

by delivering the articles to the Secretary of State for filing.

Articles of correction are effective on the effective date of the document they correct except as to persons relying to their detriment on the uncorrected document. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective when filed.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 80, eff. June 6, 2008.

§ 1.25.
Filing duty of Secretary of State.

If a document delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing satisfies the requirements of section 1.20 of this title, the Secretary of State shall file it.

The Secretary of State files a document by recording it as “filed” together with his or her name and official title on the date and time of receipt, on both the document and on the record of the receipt for the filing fee. After filing a document, except as provided in sections 5.03 and 15.10 of this title, the Secretary of State shall deliver a copy of the document and filing fee receipt (or acknowledgment of receipt if no fee is required) to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document, he or she shall return it to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative within five days after the document is delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for refusing to file the document.

The Secretary of State’s duty to file documents under this section is ministerial. His or her filing or refusing to file a document does not:

affect the validity or invalidity of the document in whole or in part;

relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document;

create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 81, eff. June 6, 2008.

§ 1.26.
Appeal from Secretary of State’s refusal to file document.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document delivered to his or her office for filing, the domestic or foreign corporation may appeal the refusal within 30 days after the return of the document to the Superior Court of the county of the corporation’s principal office, in the case of a domestic corporation, or the corporation’s registered office, in the case of a foreign corporation. The appeal is commenced by filing a civil action to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the Secretary of State’s explanation of his or her refusal to file. Such a civil action shall be tried by the court without a jury.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to file the document, sustain the Secretary’s action, or take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final judgment may be appealed as in other civil actions.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 1.27.
Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate from the Secretary of State delivered with a copy of a document filed by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence that the document is on file with the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2007, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 82, eff. June 6, 2008.

§ 1.28.
Certificate of good standing.

Anyone may apply to the Secretary of State to furnish a certificate of good standing for a domestic corporation or a certificate of authorization for a foreign corporation.

A certificate of good standing or authorization sets forth:

the domestic corporation’s corporate name or the foreign corporation’s corporate name used in this State;

that:

the domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of this state, the date of its incorporation, and the period of its duration if less than perpetual; or

the foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in this State;

that all fees and penalties owed to this state under section 1.22 of this title have been paid if:

payment is reflected in the records of the Secretary of State; and

nonpayment affects the existence or authorization of the domestic or foreign corporations;

that its most recent annual report required by section 16.22 of this title has been delivered to the Secretary of State;

that articles of dissolution have not been filed; and

other facts of records in the office of the Secretary of State that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of good standing or authorization issued by the Secretary of State may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in existence or is authorized to transact business in this State.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 1.29.
Signing false documents.

No officer, director, or incorporator may sign a document, knowing that the document is false in any material respect, and intending that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

A person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be fined not more than $1,000.00.

A person harmed by reliance on a false document filed in violation of the provisions of subsection (a) of this section may bring an action against the person signing and filing such document for damages and such further relief as the court deems proper.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.